Illinois, session 104th, HB5554.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by adding 5Section 11-208.10 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/11-208.10 new)7    Sec. 11-208.10. Automated traffic law enforcement for 8obstruction of traffic at intersections in municipalities with 9a population of 1,000,000 or more.10    (a) For purposes of this Section:11    "Automated traffic law enforcement system" means a device 12with one or more motor vehicle sensors that produces a 13recorded image of a motor vehicle's violation of Section 1411-1425 or a similar provision of a local ordinance and is 15designed to obtain a clear recorded image of the vehicle and 16the vehicle's license plate, with the recorded image 17displaying the time, date, and location of the violation.18    "Obstruction of traffic at intersections" means a 19violation of Section 11-1425 or a similar local ordinance 20prohibiting a driver from entering an intersection or marked 21crosswalk unless there is sufficient space to accommodate the 22vehicle without obstructing the passage of another vehicle or 23pedestrian.  HB5554- 2 -LRB104 19784 LNS 33234 b1    "Recorded images" means images recorded by an automated 2traffic law enforcement system on (i) 2 or more photographs, 3(ii) 2 or more microphotographs, (iii) 2 or more electronic 4images, or (iv) a video recording showing the motor vehicle 5and, on at least one image or portion of the recording, clearly 6identifying the registration plate or digital registration 7plate number of the motor vehicle.8    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a 9municipality with a population of 1,000,000 or more may use an 10automated traffic law enforcement system to record and enforce 11violations of Section 11-1425 or a similar ordinance. A law 12enforcement officer is not required to be present when the 13violation occurs or to witness the violation.14    (c) This Section does not authorize the use of automated 15systems for speed enforcement, which remains subject to 16Section 11-208.8 and the State's exclusive regulation of 17automated speed enforcement except as provided therein.18    (d) For each violation recorded by an automated traffic 19law enforcement system under this Section, the municipality 20having jurisdiction shall issue a written notice of violation 21to the registered owner by mail within 30 days after the 22Secretary of State identifies the owner, but no later than 90 23days after the violation. The municipality shall make the 24recorded images accessible to the alleged violator via an 25Internet website.26    (e) The notice shall include:  HB5554- 3 -LRB104 19784 LNS 33234 b1        (1) the name and address of the registered owner;2        (2) the registration number of the motor vehicle;3        (3) the violation charged;4        (4) the date, time, and location of the violation;5        (5) a copy of the recorded images;6        (6) the amount of the civil penalty and the date by 7    which it must be paid;8        (7) a statement that recorded images are evidence of a 9    violation;10        (8) a warning that failure to pay, complete any 11    required program, or contest in a timely manner is an 12    admission of liability;13        (9) a statement that the person may elect to proceed 14    by paying the fine, completing a required traffic 15    education program, or both, or by challenging the charge 16    in court, by mail, or by administrative hearing; and17        (10) a website address where the person may view the 18    recorded images of the violation.19    (f) A notice alleging the violation based on recorded 20images shall be evidence of the facts contained therein and 21admissible in any proceeding alleging a violation under this 22Section. Recorded images shall be confidential and made 23available only to the alleged violator and governmental and 24law enforcement agencies for adjudication, statistical, or 25other governmental purposes. Any recorded image evidencing a 26violation may be admissible in proceedings resulting from the   HB5554- 4 -LRB104 19784 LNS 33234 b1citation.2    (g) The court or hearing officer may consider in defense 3of a violation:4        (1) that the motor vehicle or its registration plates 5    or digital registration plates were stolen before the 6    violation and were not under the control or in the 7    possession of the owner or lessee at the time;8        (2) that the motor vehicle was hijacked before the 9    violation and was not under the control or in the 10    possession of the owner or lessee at the time; and11        (3) any other evidence or issues provided by municipal 12    ordinance.13    To establish theft or hijacking, the owner or lessee must 14submit proof of a timely report to a law enforcement agency.15    (h) Unless the driver received a Uniform Traffic Citation 16from a police officer at the time of the violation, the motor 17vehicle owner is subject to a civil penalty not exceeding $100 18or the completion of a traffic education program, or both, 19plus an additional penalty of not more than $100 for failure to 20pay the original penalty or complete a required program in a 21timely manner. A violation under this Section is not a 22violation of a traffic regulation governing the movement of 23vehicles and may not be recorded on the owner's driving 24record. A registered owner holding a valid commercial driver's 25license is not required to complete a traffic education 26program.  HB5554- 5 -LRB104 19784 LNS 33234 b1    (i) Each intersection monitored by an automated traffic 2law enforcement system under this Section must have a posted 3sign visible to approaching traffic indicating that automated 4enforcement is in use. The municipality shall post on its 5website the locations where an automated traffic law 6enforcement system is installed.7    (j) Compensation paid for an automated traffic law 8enforcement system must be based on the value of the equipment 9or services provided and may not be based on the number of 10citations issued or the revenue generated. No member of the 11General Assembly and no officer or employee of a municipality 12or county shall knowingly accept employment or receive 13compensation or fees for services from a vendor that provides 14automated traffic law enforcement system equipment or services 15to municipalities or counties. This prohibition applies for 2 16years after leaving such office or employment.17    (k) A lessor of a motor vehicle shall not be liable for a 18violation under this Section if, upon timely request and 19within 60 days of receipt, the lessor provides the name and 20address of the lessee, after which the municipality may issue 21the violation to the lessee in the same manner as to a 22registered owner, and the lessee may be held liable.23    (l) This Section applies only to municipalities with a 24population of 1,000,000 or more inhabitants.25    (m) Nothing in this Section alters the substantive 26elements of Section 11-1425, which prohibits a driver from   HB5554- 6 -LRB104 19784 LNS 33234 b1entering an intersection or marked crosswalk unless there is 2sufficient space on the other side to accommodate the vehicle 3without obstructing the passage of other vehicles or 4pedestrians.5    (n) The Secretary may adopt rules necessary to implement 6this Section, including permits, approvals, or authorizations 7for placement, installation, or operation, consistent with 8timelines and revocation procedures applicable to automated 9traffic law enforcement systems. 10    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 11severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes.